Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2 General Provisions
63-6-221. Office-based surgeries.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of medical examiners;

“Level II office-based surgery” means Level II surgery, as defined by the board of medical examiners in its rules and regulations, that is performed outside of a hospital, an ambulatory surgical treatment center or other medical facility licensed by the department of health;

“Office-based surgery” or “Level III office-based surgery” means Level III surgery requiring a level of sedation beyond the level of sedation defined by the board of medical examiners as Level II surgery that is performed outside a hospital, an ambulatory surgical treatment center or other medical facility licensed by the department of health;

“Physician” means any person licensed under this chapter; and

“Surgical suite” means both the operating and recovery room or rooms located in a physician's office where Level III office-based surgery is to be performed.

The board shall have the duty and responsibility to regulate the practice of office-based surgery, including the promulgation of rules necessary to promote patient health and safety in such practices, including, but not limited to, a mechanism by which all office-based surgical suites are surveyed and certified by the board.

The board shall specifically identify in rules the parameters to be used in determining Level III surgical procedures and multiple procedures that may be performed in an office-based setting pursuant to the level of anesthesia involved in the procedures. In addition, the board shall promulgate age and risk classification criteria of patients eligible for Level III office-based surgical procedures.

By December 30, 2007, the board shall adopt rules establishing a specific list of approved Level III surgical procedures that can be performed in a physician's office in this state. The ambulatory surgical center covered procedures list promulgated by the centers of medicare and medicaid shall be used as a guide. No physician shall perform any Level III surgical procedures that are not included on the list promulgated by the board. The board may modify the list as the board deems necessary. The board shall also promulgate rules addressing the minimum requirements deemed necessary by the board for the safe performance of office-based surgery.

Using the rules established for ambulatory surgical treatment centers as guidelines, the board shall promulgate rules relative to infection control, life safety, patient rights, hazardous waste and equipment and supplies necessary to assure the safety of patients undergoing office-based surgery. Any provision in the ambulatory surgical treatment center rules addressing infection control, life safety, patient rights, hazardous waste and equipment and supplies that is not adopted by the board shall require a statement entered into the official minutes from the board justifying the board's decision.

No more than three (3) patients undergoing Level III office-based surgery in a physician’s office may be incapable of self-preservation at the same time. The board shall promulgate rules requiring physician offices that perform office-based surgery to adopt bylaws that put in place a management system and documentation that will ensure that no more than three (3) patients that are in surgery or recovery are incapable of self-preservation at the same time. The bylaws and documentation of the management system shall be included in the application for surgical suite certification.

Except for emergencies, a surgical suite certified for office-based surgery may be utilized only by physician employees of the practice in which the surgical suite is located. Surgical suites may not be shared with other practices or other physicians.

The board shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, contract or other written arrangement with the department of health such that the department:

Provides a site survey of the surgical suites sought to be certified to perform office-based surgery. A physician office at which office-based surgeries are being performed as of October 1, 2007, shall submit both a request for a site survey on an application form developed by the board and remit payment of the office-based surgery fee to the department by October 1, 2007. If the office makes a timely filing in accordance with this subdivision (h)(1), the physician's office may continue to be a site for office-based surgeries pending completion of a survey confirming compliance with board rules and subsequent issuance of a certification of the surgical suite or suites. A physician office at which office-based surgeries are not being performed as of October 1, 2007, shall not perform any such procedures until an application form and payment of the office-based surgery fee is submitted to the board and a site survey is completed by the department and a certification of the surgical suite is issued by the board;

Is authorized to require plans of correction and to verify that the plans of correction have been implemented;

Is authorized to initiate subsequent, unannounced site surveys during regular business hours as long as the physician office continues to be used to perform office-based surgeries, but no more frequently than once every twelve (12) months; and

Is authorized to respond to any complaints made by patients or the public against a physician who performs office-based surgery or a physician's office at which office-based surgery is being performed at the request of the office of investigations.

The results of all site surveys shall be transmitted by the department to the board. The results shall include any requirement for plans of correction, the department's determination of the acceptability of the submitted plans of correction and the department's verification that the plans of correction have been implemented. The board shall make a final determination on certifying the surgical suite for performance of office-based surgeries. The results of site surveys and board determinations shall be shared on a routine basis with the board for licensing health care facilities.

The results of all complaint investigations by department staff shall be transmitted to the board for resolution; however, that information shall at all times be maintained as confidential and not available to the public except to the extent § 63-1-117(g) applies.

Any physician office that desires to be certified to perform office-based surgery shall pay to the department an annual office-based surgery fee as set by the board.

A physician office at which office-based surgery is being performed shall ensure that claims data is reported to the commissioner of health on a form approved by the department of health. The data shall be submitted through a third party approved by the department of health for the purpose of editing the data according to rules and regulations established by the commissioner. The physician office shall be responsible for the costs associated with processing of the data by the approved vendors. The claims data shall be reported at least quarterly to the commissioner. No information shall be made available to the public by the commissioner that reasonably could be expected to reveal the identity of any patient. The claims data reported to the commissioner under this section are confidential and not available to the public until the commissioner processes and verifies the data. The commissioner shall prescribe conditions under which the processed and verified data are available to the public.

Except as provided in subdivision (h)(1), a physician office surgical suite is required to be certified by the board in order to perform office-based surgery. A physician office that proposes to perform office-based surgery shall submit to the board, on an application form provided by the board, at least the following:

Level III procedures expected to be performed by each physician;

The specialty board certification or board eligibility of the physician or physicians performing Level III procedures, if any;

Verification of health care liability coverage for all physicians performing Level III procedures;

Verification of hospital staff privileges for all physicians performing Level III procedures;

The name of a responsible physician in whose name the surgical suite certification shall be issued for that office and a list of the physicians with the practice who are going to be performing Level III office-based surgeries; and

The documentation required by subsection (f) regarding incapacitated patient limits.

The form required by subdivision (m)(1) shall serve as an application form, but the information on the form shall be updated as appropriate when any information on it has changed.

The board shall notify all physicians of the office-based surgery certification requirements. Failure of a physician performing office-based surgery or a physician office at which office-based surgery is being performed to abide by this section, any rules promulgated pursuant to this section or of § 68-11-211 may be grounds for disciplinary action or termination of either the rights of the physician to perform office-based surgery or the surgical suite's certification by the physician's licensing board, or both disciplinary action and termination. For purposes of § 4-5-320(c), the public health, safety and welfare imperatively require emergency action at any time that a previously authorized surgical suite fails to maintain the standards set by the board.

Applicants for initial licensure or reinstatement of a previously issued license shall indicate to the board on the appropriate licensure application if they intend to perform Level II office-based surgery procedures as defined by the rules of the board of medical examiners and that are integral to a planned treatment regimen and not performed on an urgent or emergent basis.

Licensed physicians who perform Level II office-based surgery at the time of licensure renewal shall indicate to the board on the licensure renewal application if the licensee currently performs Level II office-based surgery procedures as defined in the rules of the board of medical examiners and that are integral to a planned treatment regimen and not performed on an urgent or emergent basis.

In order for health care providers and the board to work together to collect meaningful health care data, so as to minimize the frequency and severity of certain unexpected events and improve the delivery of health care services, each physician who performs any Level II office-based surgery or Level III office-based surgery that results in any of the following unanticipated events shall notify the board in writing within fifteen (15) calendar days following the physician's discovery of the event:

The death of a patient during any Level II office-based surgery or Level III office-based surgery or within seventy-two (72) hours thereafter;

The transport of a patient to a hospital emergency department except those related to a natural course of the patient's illness or underlying condition;

The unplanned admission of a patient to a hospital within seventy-two (72) hours of discharge, only if the admission is related to the Level II office-based surgery or Level III office-based surgery, except those related to a natural course of the patient's illness or underlying condition;

The discovery of a foreign object erroneously remaining in a patient from a Level II office-based surgery or Level III office-based surgery at that office; or

The performance of the wrong surgical procedure, surgery on the wrong site or surgery on the wrong patient.

Records of reportable events should be in writing and should include at a minimum the following:

The physician's name and license number;

The date and time of the occurrence or discovery of the incident;

The office and address where the incident took place;

The name and address of the patient;

The type of Level II office-based surgery or Level III office-based surgery that was performed;

The type and dosage of sedation or anesthesia utilized during the procedure;

The circumstances surrounding the incident; and

The type or types of events required to be reported as provided in subsection (q).

The filing of a report as required by subsection (q) does not, in and of itself, constitute an acknowledgement or admission of health care liability, error or omission. Upon receipt of the report, the board may, in its discretion, obtain patient and other records pursuant to authority granted to it in § 63-1-117. The reporting form and any supporting documentation reviewed or obtained by the board pursuant to this section and any amendments to the reports shall be confidential and not subject to discovery, subpoena or legal compulsion for release to any person or entity; nor shall they be admissible in any civil or administrative proceeding, other than a disciplinary proceeding by the board; nor shall they be subject to any open records request made pursuant to title 10, chapter 7, part 5 or any other law. This section shall not affect any of the provisions of or limit the protections provided by § 63-1-150.

Failure to comply with the requirements of subsections (o)-(s) constitutes grounds for disciplinary action by the board in its discretion pursuant to § 63-6-214.

Acts 2007, ch. 373, § 1; 2008, ch. 927, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 637, §§ 1-6; 2012, ch. 798, §§ 38, 39; 2017, ch. 4, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-6-221 (Acts 1975, ch. 182, §§ 1-5; 1976, ch. 403, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 63-625 — 63-629) concerning licensure of Tennessee citizens who attend the Universidad Autonoma de Guadalajara was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 905, § 8.

Acts 2007, ch. 373, § 6 provided that the board of medical examiners and the board of osteopathic examination are authorized to promulgate public necessity rules (now emergency rules) necessary to carry out the provisions of the act in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “provided by § 63-1-150” for “§§ 63-6-219 [repealed] and 63-9-114” at the end of (s).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 4, § 11. March 15, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-6-222. Emergency treatment of minors.

Any licensed physician may perform emergency medical or surgical treatment on a minor, despite the absence of parental consent or court order, where such physician has a good faith belief that delay in rendering emergency care would, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, result in a serious threat to the life of the minor or a serious worsening of such minor's medical condition and that such emergency treatment is necessary to save the minor's life or prevent further deterioration of the minor's condition.

Such treatment shall be commenced only after a reasonable effort is made to notify the minor's parents or guardian, if known or readily ascertainable.

Any physician rendering emergency care to a minor pursuant to this section shall not be liable for civil damages, except such damages as may result from the negligence of the physician in rendering such care.

Acts 1981, ch. 242, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-630.

Cross-References. Courses in detection and treatment of child sexual abuse, § 49-7-117.

“Good Samaritan Law,” § 63-6-218.

Prenatal care for minors, § 63-6-223.

Treatment of juvenile drug users, § 63-6-220.

63-6-223. Prenatal and peripartum care for minors.

Any person licensed to practice medicine, including those persons rendering service pursuant to § 63-6-204, may, for the purpose of providing prenatal care, examine, diagnose and treat a minor without the knowledge or consent of the parents or legal guardian of the minor and shall incur no civil or criminal liability in connection therewith except for negligence.

Any person licensed to practice medicine, including those persons rendering service pursuant to § 63-6-204, may, for the purpose of providing peripartum care, which may include providing peripartum analgesia, examine, diagnose, and treat a minor who is at least fourteen (14) years of age without the knowledge or consent of the parents or legal guardian of the minor and shall incur no civil or criminal liability in connection therewith except for negligence.

Acts 1986, ch. 581, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-6-224; Acts 2017, ch. 138, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-6-223 was transferred to § 63-6-224.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 138, § 2. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Emergency treatment of minors, § 63-6-222.

63-6-224. Regulation of persons operating X-ray equipment.
[Transferred.]

Acts 1982, ch. 905, § 7; T.C.A., § 63-6-223; Acts 2000, ch. 956, § 1; transferred § 63-6-902 by Acts 2016, ch. 1029, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Former § 63-6-224 was transferred to § 63-6-902 by authority of the Code Commission. For this section as effective on January 1, 2017, please see § 63-6-902.

63-6-225. Unlawful division of fees by physicians.

It is an offense for any licensed physician or surgeon to divide or to agree to divide any fee or compensation of any sort received or charged in the practice of medicine or surgery with any person without the knowledge and consent of the person paying the fee or compensation or against whom the fee may be charged.

This section does not prohibit a physician from compensating any independent contractor that provides goods or services to the physician on the basis of a percentage of the physician's fees generated in the practice of medicine. The percentage paid must be reasonably related to the value of the goods or services provided. Payments by physicians in return for referrals are prohibited.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 3; 1995, ch. 466, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section is the successor to former § 39-6-1202.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of section, OAG 95-030 (4/5/95).

Constitutionality, OAG 95-030 (4/5/95).

63-6-226. Additional penalty — Suit for recovery.

Any person who violates § 63-6-225 shall also forfeit and pay treble the value of the fee or compensation to the person applying the same or against whom the fee may be charged, or from whom it may have been demanded, and if the party entitled to sue does not sue within two (2) years after the fee or compensation has been paid or demanded, then the state shall have the right to sue for and recover such treble amount, which shall, upon recovery, be paid one-half (½) into the state treasury and one-half (½) to the officer prosecuting the suit.

It is the duty of the attorney general and reporter, or of the district attorney general of any county in which service of process may be had upon the person liable, to institute in the name of the state all suits necessary for the recovery of the sum of money.

Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section is the successor to former § 39-6-1203.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

63-6-227. Cancellation of license upon conviction.

The license of any physician or surgeon who is convicted of a violation of § 63-6-225 may, upon the first conviction, and shall, upon any subsequent conviction, be adjudged to be cancelled and annulled by the court before which the conviction may be and, without further trial or hearing, the physician or surgeon shall not thereafter again be admitted to practice medicine or surgery within this state.

Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section is the successor to former § 39-6-1204.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-6-228. Community health management information systems.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Community Health Management Information System Law of 1993.”

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Collected data” means health care data consisting of all information, interviews or other reports, statements, memoranda or other information furnished from all sources and in whatever form to the quality assessment committee, together with the records, reports, proceedings and other information used by the quality assessment committee to reach its conclusions in the form of releasable data as defined in this section;

“Community health management information system (CHMIS)” means any broad based organization, including, but not limited to, providers of health care goods and services, payors for health care goods and services, including insurors and employers, and users of health care goods and services, whose goal is to monitor and improve the level of community wellness and the quality of health care rendered by providers of health care delivery services and the financial reimbursement systems in a county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Quality assessment committee” means a committee of a CHMIS consisting primarily of physicians and other providers of health care, with insurors and employers, whose purpose is to collect, analyze and refine health care data as part of the CHMIS; and

“Releasable data” means summaries and conclusions of collected data of the quality assessment committee determined by such quality assessment committee to be scientifically valid and formally delivered to the quality executive committee to achieve the purposes of the CHMIS.

It is the stated policy of Tennessee to encourage each CHMIS to candidly, conscientiously and objectively monitor and improve the level of community wellness and quality of health care delivery services and financial reimbursement systems. Tennessee further recognizes that confidentiality is essential both to effective functioning of the CHMIS and to continued improvement in the access to, the efficiency of and the quality of health care services. As incentive for the providers, payors and users of health care services to participate in a quality assessment committee, such quality assessment committee must be protected from liability for its good faith efforts. To this end, a quality assessment committee of a CHMIS should be granted certain immunities relating to its actions undertaken as part of its responsibility to collect, analyze and refine health care data. In instances of a quality assessment committee examining the appropriateness of physicians' fees, this immunity must also extend to restraint of trade claims under title 47, chapter 25.

All health care professional associations and societies and other organizations, including insurors and employers, institutions, foundations, entities and associated communities as identified in subsection (c), physicians, registered nurses, hospitals, hospital administrators and employees, members of boards of directors or trustees of any publicly supported or privately supported hospital or other such provider of health care, any person acting as a staff member of a quality assessment committee of a CHMIS, any person under a contract or other formal agreement with a quality assessment committee of a CHMIS, any person who participates with or assists a quality assessment committee of a CHMIS with respect to its functions or any other individual appointed to any quality assessment committee as such term is described in subsection (b) shall be immune from liability to any patient, individual or organization for furnishing information, data, reports or records to any such quality assessment committee or for damages resulting from any decision, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by a quality assessment committee undertaken or performed within the scope or function of the duties of such quality assessment committees, if made or taken in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), any person providing information to a quality assessment committee of a CHMIS regarding the analysis and refinement of health care data shall be immune from liability to any person, unless such information is false and the person providing it had actual knowledge of such falsity.

All collected data of the CHMIS are declared to be privileged and shall not be public records nor be available for court subpoena or for discovery proceedings. The CHMIS, through a quality executive committee or similar committee, shall establish particular categories of health care data and refinement periods for each category of health care data, whether such data is collected data or releasable data. Releasable data shall be subject to the privileges and limitations of collected data for refinement periods as determined by the quality executive committee. When the refinement period has expired for a particular category of releasable data, then such immunities and privileges set forth in this subsection (e) shall no longer apply to the releasable data for such category. The disclosure of confidential, privileged quality assessment committee information to original sources during the refinement period, or as a report by the quality assessment committee to the quality executive committee, the CHMIS board of directors or another executive committee within the CHMIS, prior to the expiration of the refinement period does not constitute either a waiver of confidentiality or privilege. Nothing contained in this subsection (e) applies to records made in the regular course of business by a hospital or other provider of health care and information, documents or records otherwise available from original sources are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil proceedings merely because they were presented during the refinement period of the quality assessment committee.

Acts 1993, ch. 333, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

63-6-229. Consent to medical treatment by a minor.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in the absence or unavailability of a spouse, any minor is authorized and empowered to consent for such minor's child, either orally or otherwise, to any surgical or medical treatment or procedures not prohibited by law that may be suggested, recommended, prescribed or directed by a duly licensed physician.

Acts 1995, ch. 317, § 1.

Cross-References. Validity of a durable power of attorney for health care given to a nonparent, see § 34-6-216.

63-6-230. Inactive licenses to perform pro bono services.

The board of medical examiners shall establish by rule an inactive license category that allows physicians to perform services without compensation only for those persons receiving services from organizations that have received a determination of exemption under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)). Such inactive license category shall not authorize any other practice of medicine.

Acts 1997, ch. 345, § 3.

63-6-231. Transfer of patient medical information outside the state.

The transfer of patient medical information to a person in another state who is not licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the state of Tennessee, using any electronic, telephonic or fiber optic means or by any other method, constitutes the practice of medicine or osteopathy if such information is employed to diagnose and/or treat, any person physically located within the state of Tennessee.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, the transfer of such information shall not constitute the practice of medicine if:

Such information is to be used by a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy licensed in Tennessee;

Such information is to be used for a second opinion requested by a Tennessee licensed medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy; provided, no charges are assessed for such second opinion;

Such information is to be used by an out-of-state physician for treatment of a person who is seeking medical treatment out of Tennessee;

Such information is used to determine if such patient is covered by insurance;

Such information is to be used by physicians in another state to provide occasional academic consultations to a medical school located in Tennessee; or

Such information is used by insurance or related companies for risk evaluation, utilization review, claims processing and/or evaluation of claimant's rehabilitation, including establishing and administering rehabilitation plans. The establishing and administering of such rehabilitation plans shall not include the diagnosis and/or treatment of any person physically located within the state of Tennessee as prohibited by subsection (a).

This section shall not apply to research hospitals, as defined in § 63-6-204(f)(7).

Acts 1998, ch. 1017, §§ 1, 2.

63-6-232. Disciplinary complaints against chelation therapist.

All disciplinary complaints filed against a chelation therapist shall be judged by the standard of medical care in the community where such complaint originated.

Acts 2001, ch. 296, § 1.

63-6-233. Continuing medical education.

Any person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall complete continuing medical education as required by the board of medical examiners. The board of medical examiners may establish waivers from such continuing medical education requirements and exemptions for certain licensees through rules and regulations.

The board of medical examiners shall establish the continuing medical educational requirements, waivers and exemptions through rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2001, ch. 320, § 1.

63-6-234. Physicians serving as United States public health service commissioned officers.

A physician serving as a United States public health service commissioned officer who is trained as a national health service corps ready responder shall be authorized to practice medicine at federally qualified health centers while pursuing licensure as provided in this part under the following conditions:

The physician has first filed an application for licensure as provided in this part;

The physician, prior to commencing practice, submits a written statement to the board that all of the physician's medical licenses, including the authority to practice in United States public health service, are unencumbered by disciplinary actions, unresolved disciplinary complaints or unresolved health care liability lawsuits; and

The physician timely complies with all board rules governing the application process and immediately ceases practicing medicine until a license is subsequently granted should the initial licensure application be closed either for failure to provide timely required information or is denied by the board.

Acts 2003, ch. 43, § 1; 2012, ch. 798, § 40.

Cross-References. Licensees in armed forces or public health service, § 63-1-110.

63-6-235. Special volunteer license for practice in free health clinic — Exemption from fees — Renewal.

A physician licensed pursuant to this chapter under a special volunteer license who is a medical practitioner, as defined by § 63-1-201, engaged in practice at a free health clinic shall not be subject to license fees under this chapter. The board of medical examiners may issue a special volunteer license, as such license is defined in § 63-1-201, to qualified applicants without fee or charge. Such license shall be for a period of two (2) years and may be renewed on a biennial basis.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a retired or inactive physician may apply for and receive a special volunteer license for practice only in volunteer service at benevolent or humanitarian service project locations outside of the state. The board of medical examiners is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this section.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 2; 2005, ch. 250, § 1.

Cross-References. Retirement, §§ 63-1-111, 63-6-210.

63-6-236. Drug prescriptions.

Any handwritten prescription order for a drug prepared by a physician or surgeon who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription. The handwritten prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing physician or surgeon, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, handwritten in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing physician or surgeon must sign the handwritten prescription order on the day it is issued, unless the prescription order is:

Issued as a standing order in a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Prescribed by a physician or surgeon in the department of health or local health departments or dispensed by the department of health or a local health department as stipulated in § 63-10-205.

Any typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by a physician or surgeon who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the typed or computer-generated prescription order. The prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing physician or surgeon, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, recorded in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug and the month and day that the typed or computer-generated prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing physician or surgeon must sign the typed or computer-generated prescription order on the day it is issued, unless the prescription order is:

Issued as a standing order in a hospital, nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Prescribed by a physician or surgeon in the department of health or local health departments or dispensed by the department of health or a local health department as stipulated in § 63-10-205.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a physician or surgeon from issuing a verbal prescription order.

All handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription orders must be issued on either tamper-resistant prescription paper or printed utilizing a technology that results in a tamper-resistant prescription that meets the current centers for medicare and medicaid service guidance to state medicaid directors regarding § 7002(b) of the United States Troop Readiness, Veterans' Care, Katrina Recovery, and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act of 2007, P.L. 110-28, and meets or exceeds specific TennCare requirements for tamper-resistant prescriptions.

Subdivision (d)(1) shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the doctor or other person authorized to write prescriptions, writes the order into the hospital medical record and then the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 5; 2005, ch. 12, § 3; 2008, ch. 1035, §§ 4, 9; 2010, ch. 795, § 12; 2013, ch. 74, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004.”

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner’s or pharmacist’s ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse’s ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 10 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 11 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of the act in accordance with title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate healthcare providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 19 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before January 1, 2011.